Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1037.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-442, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-442. Committee approval; adoption of vote tabulating equipment; experimental use; emergency A. The secretary of state shall appoint a committee of three persons, to consist of a member of the engineering college at one of the universities, a member of the state bar of Arizona and one person familiar with voting processes in the this state, no not more than two of whom shall be of the same political party, and at least one of whom shall have at least five years of experience with and shall be able to render an opinion based on knowledge of, training in or education in electronic voting systems, procedures and security. The committee shall investigate and test the various types of vote recording or tabulating machines or devices that may be used under this article. The committee shall submit its recommendations to the secretary of state who shall make final adoption of the type or types, make or makes, model or models to be certified for use in this state. The committee shall serve without compensation. B. Machines or devices used at any election for federal, state or county offices may only be certified for use in this state and may only be used in this state if they comply with the help America vote act of 2002 (p.l. 107-252; 116 stat. 1666; 52 united states code sections 20901 through 21145) and if those machines or devices have been tested and approved by a laboratory that is accredited pursuant to the help America vote act of 2002. C. After consultation with the committee prescribed by subsection A of this section, the secretary of state shall adopt standards that specify the criteria for loss of certification for equipment that was used at any election for federal, state or county offices and that was previously certified for use in this state. On loss of certification, machines or devices used at any election may not be used for any election for federal, state or county offices in this state unless recertified for use in this state. D. The secretary of state may revoke the certification of any voting system or device for use in a federal, state or county election in this state or may prohibit for up to five years the purchase, lease or use of any voting system or device leased, installed or used by a person or firm in connection with a federal, state or county election in this state, or both, if either of the following occurs: 1. The person or firm installs, uses or permits allows the use of a voting system or device that is not certified for use or approved for experimental use in this state pursuant to this section. 2. The person or firm uses or includes hardware, firmware or software in a version that is not certified for use or approved for experimental use pursuant to this section in a certified voting system or device. E. The governing body of a city or town or the board of directors of an agricultural improvement district may adopt for use in elections any kind of electronic voting system or vote tabulating device approved by the secretary of state, and thereupon the voting or marking device and vote tabulating equipment may be used at any or all elections for voting, recording and counting votes cast at an election. F. The secretary of state or the governing body may provide for the experimental use of a voting system or device without a final adoption of the voting system or device, and its use at the election is as valid as if the machines had been permanently adopted. G. The secretary of state shall ensure that ELECTRONIC VOTING SYSTEMS INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, Vote recording and vote tabulating machines and election management systems that are approved for use pursuant to this section: 1. do Not have hardware installed that supports direct or indirect internet connectivity or any other form of remote access or software that allows any change to results in files or a database. 2. supports the usage and tracking of users based on unique CREDENTIALS that are changed at least once per election cycle for each user. 3. Log any deletions of ballot images, windows event logs and results files. The system also shall maintain election software logs. 4. Maintain for twenty-two months as election data the data prescribed in paragraphs 3 and 4 of this subsection. G. H. After consultation with the committee prescribed by subsection A of this section, the secretary of state may approve for emergency use an upgrade or modification to a voting system or device that is certified for use in this state if the governing body establishes in an open meeting that the election cannot be conducted without the emergency certification. Any emergency certification shall be limited to no not more than six months. At the conclusion of the certification period the voting system or device shall be decertified and unavailable for future use unless certified in accordance with this section. I. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, INDIRECT INTERNET CONNECTIVITY INCLUDES THE USE OF AN ELECTION MANAGEMENT SYSTEM GATEWAY SYSTEM. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 16, chapter 4, article 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-567, to read: START_STATUTE16-567. Polling place and voting center equipment; custody; violation; classification A. notwithstanding any other law, any voting equipment that is used in a polling place or voting center may not have internet access and must prohibit access by any means to any aggregated data or results. if the equipment has an accessible port, the port must be locked with a tamper-proof seal and must be logged in the chain of custody document when broken or accessed. the delivery, use and return of the equipment shall be logged on a chain of custody document so that the name and signature of every person who delivers, receives, uses and returns that equipment is recorded and retained as an official election record. B. a person who violates this section is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 16, chapter 4, article 10, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-605, to read: START_STATUTE16-605. Counting center equipment; election results; data; custody; violation; classification A. notwithstanding any other law, any ELECTION MANAGEMENT SYSTEM OR tabulation equipment that is used in a central counting center or other tabulation center may not have internet access, MUST NOT BE CAPABLE OF INDIRECT INTERNET CONNECTIVITY, and must prohibit access by any means to any data or results until used by authorized election personnel only. such equipment shall not have a port. the use and return of the equipment that contains election results and data shall be logged on a chain of custody document so that the name and signature of every person who delivers, receives, uses and returns the storage device or other equipment that contains election data and election results is recorded and retained as an official election record. b. notwithstanding any other law, all activities at the counting center shall be included in a nonstop video that is posted to the county's website. c. a person who negligently violates this section is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor. D. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, INDIRECT INTERNET CONNECTIVITY INCLUDES THE USE OF AN ELECTION MANAGEMENT SYSTEM GATEWAY SYSTEM. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Legislative findings The legislature finds that: 1. It has refused on multiple occasions to authorize the use of an EMS gateway system which allows for election management systems to be connected indirectly to the internet. 2. Notwithstanding this refusal, the Arizona secretary of state continues to violate the law and allow EMS systems to be connected indirectly to the internet. 3. The current secretary of state has consistently taken the position that he has authority to do whatever is not expressly prohibited, contrary to clear judicial precedent. 4. As a result of this hubris, the current secretary of state has his systems hacked by what he claims to be agents of the Iranian Revolutionary Guard, jeopardizing the security of our states voter rolls and placing Arizonans at risk of identity theft and fraud. 5. Nothing connected to the internet can be fully secured from hacking. 6. The only way to have secure elections is to ensure that no component of any elections management system is capable of connecting to the internet, directly or indirectly.